Illinois, session 104th, SB1962.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Articulation Initiative Act is 5amended by adding Section 35 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 152/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Transfer Credit Report.8    (a) By May 1, 2026, and May 1 of each subsequent year and 9in the form prescribed by the Board of Higher Education, each 10public institution of higher education shall provide the Board 11of Higher Education with a report describing any course for 12which a student who transfers to a public 4-year institution 13from another State institution of higher education is not 14granted:15        (1) academic credit at the receiving institution; or16        (2) if the student has declared a major and has not 17    changed majors, academic credit toward the student's major 18    at the receiving institution.19    (b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the 20following:21        (1) the course name and type, including program, 22    school, major or minor, and credits or units, if any;23        (2) which institution of higher education provided   SB1962- 2 -LRB104 10545 LNS 20621 b1    academic credit for the course; and2        (3) the reason why the receiving institution did not 3    grant academic credit for the course as described in 4    subsection (a).5    (c) The Board of Higher Education shall compile the data 6and deliver a report to the Governor and General Assembly no 7later than October 1, 2026 and October 1 of each subsequent 8year.